Hawaii statutes.
§414-234 Resignation and removal of
officers. (a) An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to
the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered
unless the notice specifies a later effective date. If a resignation is made
effective at a later date and the corporation accepts the future effective
date, its board of directors may fill the pending vacancy before the effective
date if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office
until the effective date.

(b) Any officer may be removed by the board of
directors whenever in its judgment the best interests of the corporation will
be served thereby, but the removal shall be without prejudice to the contract
rights, if any, of the person so removed. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001,
c 129, §25]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next